California statutes. Education Code
(a) The department shall amend its interagency agreement with the Administration for Children, Youth, and Families, Region IX, Head Start, United States Department of Health and Human Services, to permit a local educational agency to contract with a Head Start program for special education and services for individuals with exceptional needs between the ages of three and five years pursuant to this part.

(b) Apportionments allocated to Head Start programs for special education and services to individuals with exceptional needs between the ages of three and five years shall supplement and not supplant funds for which the Head Start programs are eligible, or are already receiving, from other funding sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56445.

(a) Prior to transitioning an individual with exceptional needs from a preschool program to kindergarten, or first grade as the case may be, an appropriate reassessment of the individual shall be conducted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320) of Chapter 4 to determine if the individual is still in need of special education and services.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that gains made in the special education program for individuals who received special education and services, in accordance with this chapter, are not lost by too rapid a removal of individualized programs and supports for these individuals.

(c) As part of the transitioning process, a means of monitoring continued success of the child shall be identified by the individualized education program team for those children of kindergarten or first grade equivalency who are determined to be eligible for less intensive special education programs.

(d) As part of the exit process from special education, the present performance levels and learning style shall be noted by the individualized education program team. This information shall be made available to the assigned regular education teacher upon the child’s enrollment in kindergarten or first grade as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 311, Sec. 6.5.   Effective July 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

56446.

Public special education funding shall not be used to purchase regular preschool services or to purchase any instructional service other than special education and services permitted by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 42.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

56447.1.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the responsibility of noneducational public agencies in the State of California from providing or paying for some or all of the costs of a free appropriate public education for individuals with exceptional needs between the ages of three and five years, inclusive.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit a noneducational public agency to reduce medical and other assistance available or to alter eligibility under Titles V and XIX of the Social Security Act (Subchapter V (commencing with Section 701) and Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code) with respect to the provision of a free appropriate public education for individuals with exceptional needs between the ages of three and five years, inclusive, within the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 311, Sec. 6.5.   Effective July 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Career and Vocational Education Programs, Transition Services, and Project Workability [56452. - 56474.]



  ARTICLE 1. Career and Vocational Education Programs [56452. - 56456.]

56452.

The superintendent shall ensure that the state annually secures all federal funds available for career and vocational education of individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

56453.

The superintendent and the Department of Rehabilitation shall enter into an interagency agreement to ensure that the state annually secures all federal funds available under the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, and that coordination in applying for, distributing, and using funds available under the Vocational Education Act, as amended, the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, and the Education For All Handicapped Children Act of 1975, (P.L. 94-142), as amended, including, but not limited to, application for, and use thereof, be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1353, Sec. 67.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

56454.

In order to provide local educational agencies with maximum flexibility to secure and utilize all federal funds available to enable those entities to meet the career and vocational needs of individuals with exceptional needs more effectively and efficiently, and to provide maximum federal funding to those agencies for the provision of that education, the Superintendent shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide necessary technical assistance to local educational agencies.

(b) Establish procedures for these entities to obtain available federal funds.

(c) Apply for necessary waivers of federal statutes and regulations including, but not limited to, those governing federal career and vocational education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56456.

It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies may use any state or local special education funds for approved vocational programs, services, and activities to satisfy the excess cost-matching requirements for receipt of federal vocational education funds for individuals with exceptional needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transition Services [56460. - 56463.]

56460.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That while the passage of the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975 (Public Law 94-142) and the California Master Plan for Special Education have resulted in improved educational services for individuals with exceptional needs; this has not translated into paid employment opportunities or maximum integration into our heterogeneous communities for individuals with exceptional needs.

(b) That there is no formalized process that bridges the gap between the security and structure of school and the complexity of service options and resources available for individuals with exceptional needs in the adult community.

(c) That there is insufficient coordination between educators, adult service providers, potential employers, and families and students in order to effectively plan and implement a successful transition for students to the adult world of paid employment and social independence.

(d) That because of insufficient vocational training throughout the middle and secondary school years, and effective interagency coordination and involvement of potential employers in a planning process, the majority of options available for individuals with exceptional needs in the adult community are programs that support dependence rather than independence.

(e) The goal of transition services is planned movement from secondary education to adult life that provides opportunities which maximize economic and social independence in the least restrictive environment for individuals with exceptional needs. Planning for transition from school to postsecondary environments should begin in the school system well before the student leaves the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

56461.

The superintendent shall establish the capacity to provide transition services for a broad range of individuals with exceptional needs such as employment and academic training, strategic planning, interagency coordination, and parent training.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

56462.

The transition services shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) In-service training programs, resource materials, and handbooks that identify the following:

(1) The definition of “transition,” including the major components of an effective school-based transition program.

(2) Relevant laws and regulations.

(3) The roles of other agencies in the transition process including, but not limited to, the scope of their services, eligibility criteria, and funding.

(4) The components of effective transition planning.

(5) The role of families in the individualized transition process.

(6) Resources and model programs currently available in this state.

(b) Development of the role and responsibilities of special education in the transition process, including the following:

(1) The provision of work skills training, including those skills that are necessary in order to exhibit competence on the job.

(2) The provision of multiple employment options and facilitating job or career choice by providing a variety of vocational experiences.

(3) The collection and analysis of data on what happens to pupils once they leave the school system and enter the adult world.

(4) The coordination of the transition planning process, including development of necessary interagency agreements and procedures at both state and local levels.

(5) The provision of instructional learning strategies that will assist pupils who find learning difficult in acquiring skills that will enable them to obtain diplomas, promote a positive attitude toward secondary and postsecondary education and training, and make a successful transition to postsecondary life.

(c) The development and implementation of systematic and longitudinal vocational education curriculum including the following:

(1) Instructional strategies that will prepare pupils with severe disabilities to make a successful transition to supported employment and the community.

(2) The introduction of vocational and career education curriculum in the elementary grades for those pupils who can benefit from it.

(d) Materials, resource manuals, and in-service training programs to support the active participation of families in the planning and implementation of transition-related goals and activities.

(e) The development of resources and in-service training that will support the implementation of individualized transition planning for all pupils with exceptional needs.

(f) The development of a network of model demonstration sites that illustrate a wide variety of transition models and implementation strategies.

(g) Coordination with other specialized programs that serve students who face barriers to successful transition.

(h) A research, evaluation, and dissemination program that will support the major programmatic aspects of transition services. Through a variety of competitive grants, bids, contracts, and other awards specific content areas will be developed in cooperation with a variety of field-based agencies, including local education agencies, special education local plan areas, county offices, institutions of higher education, and in-service training agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

56463.

Transition services shall be funded pursuant to the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Project Workability [56470. - 56474.]

56470.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That an essential component of transition services developed and supported by the State Department of Education is project workability.

(b) That the workability program provides instruction and experiences that reinforce core curriculum concepts and skills leading to gainful employment.

(c) That since project workability was established by the State Department of Education in 1981, substantial numbers of individuals with exceptional needs have obtained full- or part-time employment.

(d) That project workability is a true partnership established at the state level through nonfinancial interagency agreements between the State Department of Education, the Department of Employment Development, and the Department of Rehabilitation, and has elevated awareness in the private sector of the employment potential of individuals with exceptional needs, and focuses its efforts in developing careers for these youth, and preventing needless economic and social dependency on state and community agencies and resources.

(e) That local education agencies in California establish linkage between agencies, eliminate duplication of effort, and develop precedent-setting employment training practices which should be preserved and advanced to better assure future productive employable citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

56471.

(a) The program shall be administered by the State Department of Education.

(b) The department shall establish an advisory committee. This committee will include representatives from local workability projects to ensure ongoing communications.

(c) The Superintendent shall develop criteria for awarding grants, funding, and evaluating workability projects.

(d) Eligible applicants shall include local educational agencies, including school districts, county offices of education, state special schools, and charter schools.

(e) Workability project applications shall include, but
 are not limited to, the following elements:
(1) recruitment, (2) assessment, (3) counseling, (4) preemployment skills training, (5) vocational training, (6) student wages for try-out employment, (7) placement in unsubsidized employment, (8) other assistance with transition to a quality adult life, and (9) utilization of an interdisciplinary advisory committee to enhance project goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 80.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56472.

The population served by workability projects may include secondary students with disabilities, adults with disabilities and other individuals who experience barriers to successful completion of school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

56473.

Project workability shall be funded pursuant to Item 6100-161-0001 of Section 2.00 of the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56474.

The superintendent shall continue to seek additional state and federal funding for project workability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1484, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. Interagency Cooperation [56475. - 56477.]

56475.

(a) The Superintendent and the directors of the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Rehabilitation, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, and the Employment Development Department shall develop written interagency agreements or adopt joint regulations that include responsibilities, in accordance with Section 1412(a)(12) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.154 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, for the provision of special education and related services to individuals with exceptional needs in the State of California.

(b) The
 Superintendent shall develop interagency agreements with other state and local public agencies, as deemed necessary by the Superintendent, to carry out the provisions of state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 58.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

56476.

The Governor or designee of the Governor, in accordance with Section 1412(a)(12) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.154 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall ensure that each agency under the Governor’s jurisdiction enters into an interagency agreement with the Superintendent to ensure that all services that are needed to ensure a free appropriate public education are provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

56477.

(a) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year, the department shall jointly convene with the State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Health Care Services one or more workgroups that include representatives from local educational agencies, appropriate county agencies, regional centers, and legislative staff. The workgroups shall convene for the following purposes:

(1) Improving transition of three-year-old children with disabilities from regional centers to local educational agencies, to help ensure continuity of services for young children and families.

(2) Improving coordination and expansion of
 access to available federal funds through the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program, the School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment benefits.

(b) On or before October 1, 2020, the workgroups shall provide the chairs of the relevant policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance with a progress report that includes all of the following:

(1) A detailed timeline for the implementation of the workgroups, including information on the structure of the workgroups, frequency of meetings, and other relevant information.

(2) Work conducted by each workgroup to date and
 initial findings, including information gathered, if any, on potential barriers to access the Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program, the School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment benefits.

(3) Information on potential barriers to ensure smooth transitions for three-year-old children with disabilities from regional centers to local educational agencies.

(c) On or before October 1, 2021, the workgroups shall provide the chairs of the relevant policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance with a final report that includes recommendations for all of the following:

(1) Strategies to improve the state’s performance in meeting federal deadlines for transitioning three-year-old children with disabilities from individualized family service plans administered by a regional center to individualized education programs administered by a local educational agency.

(2) Best practices for regional centers and local educational agencies to ensure every three-year-old child with disabilities receives an uninterrupted continuum of support services.

(3) Program requirements and support services needed for the
 Local Educational Agency Medi-Cal Billing Option Program, the School-Based Medi-Cal Administrative Activities Program, and medically necessary federal Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment benefits to ensure ease of use and access for local educational agencies and parity of eligible services throughout the state and country.

(d) Recommendations provided pursuant to this section shall include any specific changes needed to state regulations or statutes, need for approval of amendments to the state Medicaid plan or federal waivers, changes to the implementation of federal regulations, changes to state agency support and oversight, and associated staffing or funding needed to implement the recommendations.

(e) The amount appropriated for
 purposes of this section in Provision 38 of Item 6100-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2019 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2022.

(f) The requirements for submitting a report imposed under subdivisions (b) and (c) are inoperative on October 1, 2024, and October 1, 2025, respectively, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 67.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Procedural Safeguards [56500. - 56509.]

56500.

As used in this chapter, “public agency” is identical to the definition of that term in Section 56028.5 and Section 300.33 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56500.1.

(a) All procedural safeguards under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 and following) shall be established and maintained by each noneducational and educational agency that provides education, related services, or both, to children who are individuals with exceptional needs.

(b) At each individualized education program meeting, the public education agency responsible for convening the meeting shall inform the parent and pupil of the federal and state procedural safeguards that were provided in the notice of parent rights pursuant to Section 56321.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1360, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

56500.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a complaint filed with the department regarding any alleged violations of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), or implementing regulations (Part 300 (commencing with Section 300.1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations), or a provision of this part, shall be investigated in an expeditious and effective manner in accordance with Sections 300.151 to 300.153, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A written decision shall be issued to the complainant in accordance with the 60-day time limit specified in Section 300.152 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) The party filing the complaint shall forward a copy of the complaint to the local educational agency or public agency serving the child at the same time the party files the complaint with the department, in accordance with Section 300.153(d) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Pursuant to Section 300.153(c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a complaint filed under subdivision (a) shall allege a violation that occurred not more than one year prior to the date that the complaint is received by the department.

(c) The complaint shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement that a local educational agency or public agency has violated a requirement of this part or Part B of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Title 20 (commencing with Section 1400) of the United States Code), or Part 300 (commencing with Section 300.1) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) The facts on which the statement is based.

(3) The signature and contact information for the complainant.

(4) If alleging violations with respect to a specific child, all of the following:

(A) The name and address of residence of the child.

(B) The name of the school the child is attending.

(C) In the case of a homeless child or youth within the meaning of paragraph (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), available contact information for the child, and the name of the school the child is attending.

(D) A description of the nature of the problem of the child, including facts relating to the problems.

(E) A proposed resolution of the problem to the extent known and available to the party at the time the complaint is filed.

(d) The Superintendent shall develop a model form, pursuant to Section 300.509 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to assist parents and public agencies in filing a state complaint under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 27.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56500.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that parties to special education disputes be encouraged to seek resolution through mediation prior to filing a request for a due process hearing. It is also the intent of the Legislature that these voluntary prehearing request mediation conferences be an informal process conducted in a nonadversarial atmosphere to resolve issues relating to the identification, assessment, or educational placement of the child, or the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child, to the satisfaction of both parties. Therefore, attorneys or other independent contractors used to provide legal advocacy services may not attend or otherwise participate in the prehearing request mediation conferences.

(b) This part does not preclude the parent or the public agency from being accompanied and advised by nonattorney representatives in the mediation conferences and consulting with an attorney prior to or following a mediation conference. For purposes of this section, “attorney” means an active, practicing member of the State Bar of California or another independent contractor used to provide legal advocacy services, but does not mean a parent of the pupil who is also an attorney.

(c) Requesting or participating in a mediation conference is not a prerequisite to requesting a due process hearing.

(d) All requests for a mediation conference shall be filed with the Superintendent. The party initiating a mediation conference by filing a written request with the Superintendent shall provide the other party to the mediation with a copy of the request at the same time the request is filed with the Superintendent. The mediation conference shall be conducted by a person knowledgeable in the process of reconciling differences in a nonadversarial manner and under contract with the department pursuant to Section 56504.5. The mediator shall be knowledgeable in the laws and regulations governing special education.

(e) The prehearing mediation conference shall be scheduled within 15 days of receipt by the Superintendent of the request for mediation. The mediation conference shall be completed within 30 days after receipt of the request for mediation unless both parties to the prehearing mediation conference agree to extend the time for completing the mediation. Pursuant to Section 300.506(b)(4) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and to encourage the use of mediation, the state shall bear the cost of the mediation process, including any meetings described in Section 300.506(b)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The costs of mediation shall be included in the contract described in Section 56504.5.

(f) In accordance with Section 1415(e)(2)(F) of Title 20 of the United States Code, if a resolution is reached that resolves the due process issue through the mediation process, the parties shall execute a legally binding written agreement that sets forth the resolution and that does the following:

(1) States that all discussions that occurred during the mediation process shall be confidential and may not be used as evidence in any subsequent due process hearing or civil proceeding.

(2) Is signed by both the parent and the representative of the public agency who has the authority to bind the agency.

(3) Is enforceable in any state court of competent jurisdiction or in a federal district court of the United States.

(g) If the mediation conference fails to resolve the issues to the satisfaction of all parties, the party who requested the mediation conference has the option of filing for a state-level hearing pursuant to Section 56505. The mediator may assist the parties in specifying any unresolved issues to be included in the hearing request.

(h) Any mediation conference held pursuant to this section shall be scheduled in a timely manner and shall be held at a time and place reasonably convenient to the parties to the dispute in accordance with Section 300.506(b)(5) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) The mediation conference shall be conducted in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding any procedure set forth in this chapter, a public agency and a parent, if the party initiating the mediation conference so chooses, may meet informally to resolve any issue or issues to the satisfaction of both parties prior to the mediation conference.

(2) In accordance with Section 300.506(b)(2) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a public agency may establish procedures to offer to parents and schools that choose not to use the mediation process, an opportunity to meet, at a time and location convenient to the parents, with a disinterested party as follows:

(A) Who is under contract with an appropriate alternative dispute resolution entity, or a parent training and information center or community parent resource center in the state established under Section 1471 or Section 1472 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) Who would explain the benefits of, and encourage the use of, the mediation process to the parents.

(k) The procedures and rights contained in this section shall be included in the notice of parent rights attached to the assessment plan of the pupil pursuant to Section 56321.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 28.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56500.4.

(a) Pursuant to Section 1415(b)(3) and (4) and (c)(1) of Title 20 of the United States Code, and in accordance with Section 300.503 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, prior written notice shall be given by the public agency to the parents or guardians of an individual with exceptional needs, or to the parents or guardians of a child upon initial referral for assessment, and a reasonable time before the public agency proposes to initiate or change, or refuses to initiate or change, the identification, assessment, or educational placement of the child, or the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child. In accordance with Sections 300.304 and 300.503 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the public agency shall provide a description of any assessment procedures the agency proposes to conduct.

(b) The notice required under subdivision (a) shall, in accordance with Section 300.503(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, include all of the following:

(1) A description of the action proposed or refused by the public agency.

(2) An explanation of why the public agency proposes or refuses to take the action.

(3) A description of each assessment procedure, assessment, record, or report the public agency used as a basis for the proposed or refused action.

(4) A statement that the parents of an individual with exceptional needs have protection under the procedural safeguards of this part and, if this notice is not an initial referral for assessment, the means by which a copy of a description of the procedural safeguards can be obtained.

(5) Sources for parents to contact to obtain assistance in understanding the provisions of this part.

(6) A description of other options that the individualized education program team considered and the reasons why those options were rejected.

(7) A description of other factors that are relevant to the proposal or refusal of the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 454, Sec. 29.   Effective October 10, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

56500.5.

As provided in Section 300.102(a)(3)(iii) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, parents or guardians of an individual with exceptional needs shall be given reasonable written prior notice, in accordance with Section 56500.4, that their child will be graduating from high school with a regular high school diploma because graduation from high school with a regular diploma constitutes a change in placement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56500.6.

Due process and state complaint procedures for children enrolled in private schools by their parents pursuant to Sections 56170 to 56174.5, inclusive, shall be in accordance with Section 300.140 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56501.

(a) The due process hearing procedures prescribed by this chapter extend to the parent or guardian, as defined in Section 56028, a pupil who has been emancipated, and a pupil who is a ward or dependent of the court or for whom no parent or guardian can be identified or located when the hearing officer determines that either the local educational agency has failed to appoint a surrogate parent as required by Section 7579.5 of the Government Code or the surrogate parent appointed by the local educational agency does not meet the criteria set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 7579.5 of the Government Code, and the public agency involved in any decisions regarding a pupil. The appointment of a surrogate parent after a hearing has been requested by the pupil shall not be cause for dismissal of the hearing request. The parent or guardian and the public agency involved may initiate the due process hearing procedures prescribed by this chapter under any of the following circumstances:

(1) There is a proposal to initiate or change the identification, assessment, or educational placement of the child or the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child.

(2) There is a refusal to initiate or change the identification, assessment, or educational placement of the child or the provision of a free appropriate public education to the child.

(3) The parent or guardian refuses to consent to an assessment of the child.

(4) There is a disagreement between a parent or guardian and a local educational agency regarding the availability of a program appropriate for the child, including the question of financial responsibility, as specified in Section 300.148 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The due process hearing rights prescribed by this chapter include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The right to a mediation conference pursuant to Section 56500.3.

(2) The right to request a mediation conference at any point during the hearing process. The mediation process is not to be used to deny or delay a parent’s or guardian’s right to a due process hearing, or to deny any other rights afforded under this part, or under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 56500.3, attorneys and advocates are permitted to participate in mediation conferences scheduled after the filing of a request for due process hearing.

(3) The right to examine pupil records pursuant to Section 56504. This provision shall not be construed to abrogate the rights prescribed by Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 49060) of Part 27.

(4) The right to a fair and impartial administrative hearing at the state level, before a person knowledgeable in the laws governing special education and administrative hearings, under contract with the department, pursuant to Section 56505.

(c) In addition to the rights prescribed by subdivision (b), the parent or guardian has the following rights:

(1) The right to have the pupil who is the subject of the state hearing present at the hearing.

(2) The right to open the state hearing to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56501.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, prior to the opportunity for an impartial due process hearing under this chapter, the local educational agency shall convene a resolution meeting with the parents and the relevant member or members of the individualized education program team who have specific knowledge of the facts identified in the due process hearing request, in accordance with Section 1415(f)(1)(B) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.510 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The parent and the local educational agency shall determine the relevant members of the individualized education program team to attend the meeting.

(1) The meeting shall be convened within 15 days of receiving notice of the due process hearing request of the parent.

(2) The meeting shall include a representative of the local educational agency who has decisionmaking authority on behalf of the agency.

(3) The meeting shall not include an attorney of the local educational agency, unless the parent is accompanied by an attorney.

(4) The purpose of the meeting is for the parent of the child to discuss the due process hearing issue, and the facts that form the basis of the due process hearing request, so that the local educational agency has the opportunity to resolve the dispute that is the basis for the due process hearing request.

(b) The resolution meeting described in subdivision (a) need not be held if the parents and the local educational agency agree in writing to waive the meeting, or agree to use the mediation process as provided for in this chapter.

(c) If the local educational agency has not resolved the due process hearing issue to the satisfaction of the parents within 30 days of the receipt of the due process hearing request notice, the due process hearing may occur. Except as provided in subdivision (d), the timeline for issuing a final decision under paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 56505 begins at the expiration of this 30-day period.

(d) The 45-day timeline for the due process hearing cited in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 56505 starts the day after one of the following events, provided the local educational agency also affords notice of these events to the agency or contractor providing due process hearings pursuant to Section 56504.5:

(1) Both parties agree in writing to waive the resolution meeting.

(2) After either the mediation or resolution meeting starts but before the end of the 30-day resolution period, the parties agree in writing that no agreement is possible.

(3) If both parties agree in writing to continue a mediation that started before the end of the 30-day resolution period to a date after the 30-day resolution period, but later, the parent or local educational agency withdraws from the mediation process.

(e) Except where the parties have jointly agreed to waive the resolution process or to use mediation, notwithstanding subdivision (c), the failure of the parent filing a due process hearing request to participate in the resolution meeting will delay the timelines for the resolution process and due process hearing until the meeting is held.
